src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"t:n" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** for nt:nn 
t:n <=> (Cns:*) Vow:+  [n:|n9:n] (%>) _ :Vow  WeakGrade ; ! kanta : kannan !Changed from [:Vow|Vow:] to get tuntea>tunsin etc
        k u n _ a: WeakGrade ; !TODO kunta > kunnissa etc

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kanta^WG>n
!!€ kanna0>n
!€ k a n t:n a ^WG:0 > n

!!€ kunta^WG>i2>st^A
!!€ kunn00>i>sta
!€ k u n t:n a:0 ^WG:0 > i2:i > s t ^A:a 


	
"t:r" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** for rt:rr 
t:r <=>  Vow:+ r: _ :Vow (Cns) WeakGrade ; ! kerta : kerran , jukertel - jukerrella

!! **Tests:**

!!€ jukertel^WG>l^A
!!€ jukerrel0>la
!€ j u k e r t:r e l ^WG:0 > l ^A:a
!€       a r t:r e l ^WG:0

!! **Tests:**
!!€ vete^E2I
!!€ vesi0
!€ v e t:s e:i ^E2I:0

!!€ vere^E2I
!!€ veri0
!€ v e r e:i ^E2I:0

!!€ varte^E2I
!!€ varsi0
!€ v a r t:s e:i ^E2I:0

!"t:v"
!!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!t:v <=> t a u _ Vow: WeakGrade ; !CHECK tauti


!! ### v rules
"v:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
v:0 <=> Vow v _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;




!! ### Gemination rules

!! The gemination rules **insert** the geminated consonant (thus *0:h* if *h* to the left). 
!! There is one subrule for each vowel context, in order to avoid confilcts.

"Gemination 0:h"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:h <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow (Vow) h _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i \:i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
        !Rules for metathesis type two, position 1 in Kuoppa (efter två tonande Cns)
                  Vow   l   _ [j|  m|n|r|v|%^N:] Vow: %^HMET2: ; ! ilhmaa lm, lv, 
                  Vow   r   _ [j|  m|n  |v|%^N:] Vow: %^HMET2: ; ! varhmaan, Norhjaan
                  Vow   n   _ l          Vow: %^HMET2: ; ! 
                  Vow   m   _ n          Vow: %^HMET2: ; !        
        !Rules for metathesis type two, position 2 in Kuoppa/Mantila (efter syll m huvudbetoning & Vow Vow) (ingår i P3)
                !![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Vow _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] Vow: %^HMET2: %> h: ; ! puohleen, sauhnaan
                !![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow VowNotI _ j Vow: %^HMET2: %> h: ; ! luohjaan
        !Rules for methatesis type two, position 2-3 in Kuoppa (efter syll med Vow Vow)
                Vow (%^WG:) (%>) [Vow|i2:] (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:)  [%^HMET2:] (%>) h: ; !aikoihnaan, saarnaahmaan !HÄR in h
                Vow (%>) VowNotI _ j Vow: %^HMET2: (%>) h: ; ! aluohjaan !Vow (%>) VowNotI _ j Vow: %^HMET2: (%>) h: ;
        !!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4-6 (pe-se/mhaan OCH an-tah/maan öppen/sluten betonad + kort obetonad)
                Vow+ Cns+ (Cns) Vow (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) (%^WG:) %^HMET2: (%>)  h: :Vow :Vow ; !mostly nouns; elämhään/elähmään 
                Vow+ Cns+ Vow (%>) (%^WG:) %^HMET2: (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] h: Vow Vow ;!mostly verbs; tulehmaan, neuvottelehmaan
        !!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4 (efter kort bet öppen syll + kort sonorantsluten stavelse; pe-sem-hään)
                !![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Cns Vow _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) %^HMET2: %>  h: :Vow :Vow ; !nouns; elämhään/elähmään UTAN antahmaan
                !![.#.|#] (Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns) (Cns) Vow Cns Vow (%>) %^HMET2: (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] h: Vow Vow ;!verbs; tulehmaan, neuvottelehmaan, valehtelehmaan
                




!uit-mac-443:lang-fit ttr000$ cat misc/freebound.list |grep '^.m[lnrv][aeiouyäö]$'|cut -c2,3|sort|uniq

"Gemination 0:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:j <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;

"Gemination 0:k"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:k <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tek0e>e
!!€ tekke>e

"Gemination 0:l"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:l <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :a (Dummy:*) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :ä (Dummy:*) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tul0e>e
!!€ tulle>e

"Gemination 0:m"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:m <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;

"Gemination 0:n"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:n <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!     [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ; 
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;

"Gemination 0:p"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:p <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) [:a | i5:] ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) [:e | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) [:i | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) [:o | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) [:u | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) [:y | i5:];
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) [:ä | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) [:ö | i5:] ;

"Gemination 0:s"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:s <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) [:a | i5:] ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) [:e | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) [:i | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) [:o | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) [:u | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) [:y | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) [:ä | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) [:ö | i5:] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ is0o^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ iss00>0oon



"h:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
h:0 <=>        Vow [p|t|k]                  _ e WeakGrade ;
	[.#.|Cns] Vow s :s Vow: %^HMETA: %> _ %^V: %^V: ; ! issoon
                                      Vow h _ Vow: (%^WG:) [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ; 
                                      Cns _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] %> h ; !vanha >vanhaan 
!Rules for metathesis type two, position 1 in Kuoppa/Mantila (efter två tonande Cns)
        Vow   l   :h [j|  m|n|r|v|%^N:] Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! ilhmaa lm, lv, 
        Vow   r   :h [j|  m|n  |v|%^N:] Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! Norhjaan
        Vow   n   :h  l          Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! 
        Vow   m   :h  n          Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! 
!Rules for metathesis type two, position 2 (efter syll m huvudbetoning & Vow Vow) (ingår även i P3)
        !![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Vow :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! puohleen, sauhnaan
        !![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow VowNotI :h j Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! luohjaan
!Rules for metathesis type two, position 2-3 (efter syll m Vow Vow)
        Vow (%^WG:) (%>)  [Vow|i2:]  (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) %^HMET2: %> _ ; !aikoihnaan, sairaahlaan 
        Vow (%>) VowNotI   :h j Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; !aluohjaan  Vow (%>) VowNotI   :h j Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ;
!!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4-6 (pe-se/mhaan OCH an-tah/maan öppen/sluten betonad + kort obetonad)
        Vow+ Cns+ Vow (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) (%^WG:) %^HMET2: (%>)  _ :Vow :Vow ; !mostly nouns; elämä, elämhään/elähmään
        Vow+ Cns+ Vow (%>) (%^WG:) %^HMET2: (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] _ Vow Vow ; !mostly verbs; neuvotele>hmaan, tulehmaan, olehmaan
!!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4 (efter kort bet öppen syll + kort sonorantsluten syll; pe-sem-hään, ju-te-lem-haan men ej antahmaan)
        !![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Cns Vow :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) %^HMET2: %>  _ :Vow :Vow ; !nouns; elämä, elämhään/elähmään !endast öppna stavelser
        !![.#.|#] (Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns) (Cns) Vow Cns (Cns) Vow (%>) %^HMET2: (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v] _ Vow Vow ; !Verbs; neuvotele>hmaan, tulehmaan, olehmaan  
       


! rasta^HMETA>h^Vn

! issoon, sillhoon <== check this.


!"hm to mh for InfMa Ill after short vowel 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!h:m <=> Cns Vow %> _ m: %^A: %^A: ;

!"mh to hm for InfMa Ill after short vowel 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!m:h <=> Cns Vow %> h: _ %^A: %^A: ;

!! kasva>hm^A^An
!! kasva>mhaan

!! saarna>^A>hm^A^An
!! saarna>a>hmaan

!! tule>hm^A^An
!! tule>mhaan


"Gemination 0:t"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:t <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :a (Dummy:) %>  :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :e (Dummy:) %>  :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :i (Dummy:) %>  :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :u (Dummy:) %>  :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :y (Dummy:) %>  :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :ä (Dummy:) %>  :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :ö (Dummy:) %>  :ö ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ pit0ä>^A
!!€ pittä>ä
!€ p i t 0:t ä > ^A:ä

"Gemination 0:v"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:v <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) [:a | i5:] ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) [:e | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) [:o | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) [:u | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) [:y | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) [:ä | i5:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) [:ö | i5:] ;
        ![.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  a: (Dummy:) %>  h   :a :a     ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  a: (Dummy:) %> (h) [i2: | i5:] (%^WG:) (%>) :i ;
        ![.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  a: (Dummy:) %> (h) [:i | i5:] :i ;
!! **Tests:**

!!€ kuv0a^HMETA>hiin
!!€ kuvv00>hiin
!€ k u v 0:v a:0 ^HMETA:0 > h i i n


!! ### Assimilation rules

!! These are assimilation rules for *n* on suffix borders of LNRS consonant stems.
!! There is also a rule **j:0** avoiding a *lji* sequence.

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem l"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**

 %^N:l <=> l: %> _ :Vow ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tul>^N^U
!!€ tul>lu
!€ t u l > ^N:l ^U:u

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem r"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^N:r <=> r: %> _ ;
